Utah statutes.
75-2-703.   Choice of law as to meaning and effect of governing instrument.
The meaning and legal effect of a governing instrument is determined by the
local law of the state selected in the governing instrument, unless the
application of that law is contrary to the provisions relating to the elective
share described in Part 2, Elective Share of Surviving Spouse, the provisions
relating to exempt property and allowances described in Part 4, Exempt
Property and Allowances, or any other public policy of this state otherwise
applicable to the disposition.
